Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB94.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1419.1. Face Covering or Mask Mandate Opt Out.--(a) A parent or legal guardian of a child of school age may opt out the child from wearing a face covering or mask, which the child's school imposes as a result of a recommendation or mandate from the Secretary of Health or a local board or department of health, that is primarily responsible for the prevention and control of communicable and noncommunicable disease, including disease control in public and private schools 12345678910111213141516171819 under section 3 of the act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the "Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955."(b) A parent or legal guardian of a child of school age may opt out the child from wearing a face covering or mask, which the child's school imposes as a result of a recommendation or mandate from the school board.(c) The child's school shall be required to develop and post, on the school's publicly accessible Internet website, a form to allow for a parent or legal guardian of the child to opt out the child from wearing a face covering or mask. The form may not require the parent or legal guardian to provide an excuse for the opt out.(d) The form shall also state that a child of school age whose parent or legal guardian has opted out the child from wearing a face covering or mask shall not be subject to any harassment or discriminatory treatment, including being:(1) Relegated to certain physical locations.(2) Isolated during school activities.(3) Excluded from any school-sponsored events or activities.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Face covering or mask" means material covering the nose and mouth that is secured to the head with ties, straps or loops over the ears or is wrapped around the lower face. The face covering may be made of a variety of synthetic or natural fabrics, including cotton, silk or linen. The face covering may be factory-made, sewn by hand or be improvised from household items, including scarfs, bandanas, t-shirts, sweatshirts or 20250HB0094PN0077 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 towels."Local board or department of health" means the term as defined under section 2(f) of the "Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955."Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0094PN0077 - 3 - 12345